Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-167
Bessey Memorial Fund; Board of Regents; duties.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall carry into effect the purposes of sections 85-167 to 85-171.

Laws 1917, c. 239, § 2, p. 577;

C.S.1922, § 6780;

C.S.1929, § 85-170;

R.S.1943, § 85-167;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 29.